Florida, session 2026, SB1712.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSection 943.0316, Florida Statutes, is created 27 to read: 28 943.0316âStatewide Counterintelligence and Counterterrorism 29 Unit.â 30 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to establish a 31 dedicated counterintelligence and counterterrorism unit whose 32 primary goal is to conduct statewide counterintelligence and 33 counterterrorism activities to detect, identify, neutralize, and 34 exploit adversary intelligence entities, international and 35 domestic terrorists, insider threats, corporate threats, and 36 other foreign adversaries to protect this state and the United 37 States of America. 38 (2)âAs used in this section, the term âadversary 39 intelligence entityâ includes, but is not limited to, any 40 national, foreign, multinational, friendly, competitor, 41 opponent, adversary, or recognized enemy government or 42 nongovernmental organization, company, business, corporation, 43 consortium, group, agency, cell, terrorist, insurgent, guerrilla 44 entity, or person whose demonstrated actions, views, or opinions 45 are a threat or are inimical to the interests of this state and 46 the United States of America. 47 (3)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall establish and 48 administer a Statewide Counterintelligence and Counterterrorism 49 Unit housed at the departmentâs regional operational center, 50 with a team from the unit assigned to and aligned with each 51 regional domestic security task force established under s. 52 943.0312. The unit shall identify threats by analyzing patterns 53 of life, gathering actionable intelligence, and formulating 54 effective plans of action, and by executing arrests or by 55 revealing its intent to compel a response using all 56 counterintelligence and counterterrorism tradecraft necessary to 57 protect the state from adversary intelligence entities. The unit 58 may conduct direct action missions on its own against a threat 59 or may incorporate with or into other units to counteract and 60 stop identifiable threats. 61 (4)âThe department shall: 62 (a)âCreate a 10-person team by July 1, 2027, whose main 63 purpose is to serve as the initial leadership and organizational 64 core of the full unit; 65 (b)âEstablish a statewide unit, housed at the departmentâs 66 regional operational center which must be composed of at least 67 seven teams, with a team being assigned to each regional 68 domestic security task force; and 69 (c)âEach fiscal year, request the appropriate number of 70 positions and funding required for each position in order to be 71 fully staffed no later than December 30, 2033. 72 (5)(a)âEach team shall perform tasks in support of the 73 stateâs domestic security mission, including, but not limited 74 to, providing technical operations to insider threat 75 investigations and assigning team officers to safeguard the 76 state from adversary intelligence entities by using 77 counterintelligence to detect, identify, assess, and counteract 78 threats posed by such entities. 79 (b)âEach team must, at a minimum, be composed of all of the 80 following: 81 1.âA team leader who is an assistant special agent in 82 charge; 83 2.âA facility security officer who is a special agent 84 supervisor with counterintelligence experience, to be assigned 85 four intelligence analysts; and 86 3.âA deputy team leader who is a special agent supervisor, 87 to be assigned six counterintelligence agents, one of whom must 88 be a regional federal liaison officer, one of whom must be a 89 regional state liaison officer, and one of whom must be a local 90 liaison officer. 91 (c)âEach team member must: 92 1.âHave been a member of or have received formal training 93 in any United States government agency, have served as a United 94 States servicemember, or have experience with any law 95 enforcement agency as an officer, agent, analyst, or operative 96 serving in intelligence, counterintelligence, or 97 counterterrorism; or 98 2.âHave at least 3 years of experience of actively working 99 in the fields of intelligence, counterintelligence, or 100 counterterrorism. 101 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.